Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1719.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7902 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 7902. Legislative purpose.It is the purpose of this chapter to [create a program to] provide assistance to persons, political subdivisions and municipal authorities directly affected by natural disasters and man-made disasters. Assistance will be limited to grants for projects that do not qualify for Federal assistance to help repair damages to public facilities[. Grants will be made 123456789101112131415161718192021 available by the agency in a disaster emergency area only when a Presidential disaster declaration is not covering the area.] and individual properties.Section 2. The definitions of "eligible loss" and "program" in section 7903 of Title 35 are amended to read:§ 7903. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Eligible loss." Damage to a public facility caused by a natural disaster or man-made disaster in a disaster emergency area.* * *["Program." The Public Disaster Assistance Grant Program established under Subchapter B (relating to Public Disaster Assistance Grant Program).]* * *Section 3. Section 7904 of Title 35 is amended to read:§ 7904. Construction.Grants and other payments shall be made to persons, political subdivisions or municipal authorities in a disaster emergency area for which no Presidential disaster declaration has been issued.Section 4. Chapter 79 of Title 35 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER A.1INDIVIDUAL PROPERTY DISASTER ASSISTANCESec.7911. Definitions.20250HB1719PN2115 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 7912. Establishment of fund.7913. General purpose of fund.7914. Specific uses of fund money.7915. Application process.7916. Limitations.7917. Administration.7918. Fund sources.7919. Operation of fund.§ 7911. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Flood." As defined in section 104 of the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.851, No.166), known as the Flood Plain Management Act."Flood plain." As defined in section 104 of the Flood Plain Management Act."Fund." The Individual Property Disaster Assistance Fund established under section 7912 (relating to establishment of fund)."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality, optional charter municipality or similar general purpose unit of government of this Commonwealth that may be created or authorized by statute.§ 7912. Establishment of fund.The Individual Property Disaster Assistance Fund is established within the State Treasury as a restricted revenue account for use by the agency in accordance with this subchapter.§ 7913. General purpose of fund.20250HB1719PN2115 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Subject to section 7914 (relating to specific uses of fund money), the agency shall use money in the fund to assist with the following:(1) A disaster emergency declared by executive order or proclamation of the Governor in accordance with section 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor).(2) A local disaster emergency declared by the governing body of a political subdivision in accordance with section 7501(b) (relating to general authority of political subdivisions).§ 7914. Specific uses of fund money.(a) Persons.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), money in the fund shall be made available to any person affected by a disaster emergency or local disaster emergency described in section 7913 (relating to general purpose of fund).(2) In the case of a disaster emergency or local disaster emergency described in section 7913 involving damage to real property in this Commonwealth that is caused by a flood:(i) Money in the fund shall be made available to the person owning the real property if:(A) the real property is not located in a flood plain; and(B) the person is not required to purchase flood insurance for the real property.(ii) Money in the fund shall not be made available to the person owning the real property if:(A) the real property is located in a flood plain; and20250HB1719PN2115 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) the person did not purchase required flood insurance for the real property.(b) Municipalities.--Money in the fund shall be made available to any municipality affected by a disaster emergency or local disaster emergency described in section 7913 that occurred within one year prior to the effective date of this subsection.§ 7915. Application process.(a) Form.--(1) T he agency shall develop an application form for persons and municipalities to use to request money from the fund.(2) The application form shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the agency.(b) Information.--A completed application form under this section must include the following information:(1) In the case of a person requesting money from the fund:(i) The name, location and contact information of the person.(ii) T he location of the real property. (iii) The date of the damage caused by the flood.(iv) The amount of money requested.(v) The specific purposes to be achieved as a result of receiving the money requested.(vi) Verification of eligibility to receive the money requested.(vii) Any other information or documentation required by the agency.(2) In the case of a municipality requesting money from 20250HB1719PN2115 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the fund:(i) The name, location and contact information of the municipality.(ii) The areas of the municipality affected by the disaster or emergency.(iii) The specific circumstances that prompted the request for money from the fund.(iv) The date of the disaster or emergency.(v) The amount of money requested.(vi) The specific purposes to be achieved as a result of receiving the money requested.(vii) Verification of eligibility to receive the money requested.(viii) Any other information or documentation required by the agency.(c) Review and determination.--After receipt of a completed application under subsection (b), the agency shall review the submitted application and shall determine whether to award money from the fund and, if so, the amount to be awarded.(d) Notice of determination.-- The following apply to notice of the determination under subsection (c):(1) The agency shall provide written notice to an applicant of the award or denial, in whole or in part, of the money requested.(2) Notice of the award of money shall include the amount of the money awarded and any conditions or restrictions on the use of the money.(3) Notice of the denial of money requested, in whole or in part, shall include the reasons for the denial.§ 7916. Limitations.20250HB1719PN2115 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Disbursements.-- Money from the fund shall be disbursed on a first-come, first-served basis determined by the agency and until all money in the fund is exhausted.(b) Cap.--The agency may set a cap on the amount of money awarded from the fund.(c) Conditions or restrictions.--The agency may set conditions or restrictions on the use of the money awarded from the fund.§ 7917. Administration.The agency shall implement any necessary policy or procedure to administer this subchapter.§ 7918. Fund sources.(a) Appropriation.--Money shall be appropriated by the General Assembly to the fund for the purposes of this subchapter.(b) Other sources.--(1) The agency may solicit and accept money from other sources, including State appropriations, Federal money, grants, donations, gifts and other payments from any source.(2) Money from the other sources shall be deposited into the fund.§ 7919. Operation of fund.(a) Continuing basis.-- All money transferred or otherwise deposited into the fund, including any interest and other earnings on the money in the fund, shall be appropriated to the agency on a continuing basis to provide assistance in accordance with this section.(b) No lapse.--Any money remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year, including any interest and other earnings on the money in the fund, shall not lapse or otherwise revert to 20250HB1719PN2115 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the General Fund but shall remain in the fund.Section 5. Subchapter B heading of Chapter 79 of Title 35 is amended to read:SUBCHAPTER BPUBLIC FACILITIES DISASTER ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAMSection 6. Subchapter B of Chapter 79 of Title 35 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7920. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Program." The Public Facilities Disaster Assistance Grant Program established under section 7921 (relating to establishment).Section 7. Section 7921 of Title 35 is amended to read:§ 7921. Establishment.The Public Facilities Disaster Assistance Grant Program is established within the agency to provide grants to political subdivisions and municipal authorities for assistance with repair of disaster-related damage in a disaster emergency area when the damages to public facilities are beyond the financial capabilities of the political subdivision or authority.Section 8. The following apply to the renaming of the grant program under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 79 Subch. B:(1) On or after the effective date of this paragraph, a reference to the Public Disaster Assistance Grant Program in a statute or regulation, or otherwise, shall be deemed a reference to the Public Facilities Disaster Assistance Grant Program.(2) On or after the effective date of this paragraph, 20250HB1719PN2115 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency shall recycle or continue to use any forms, stationery, business cards or other office supplies or materials which contain references to the Public Disaster Assistance Grant Program until the time these existing supplies and materials are depleted.Section 9. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1719PN2115 - 9 - 123456